District of Columbia statutes.
42-1117

Promulgation of rules and regulations by Mayor.

The Mayor shall, pursuant to subchapter I of Chapter 5 of Title 2, issue rules to implement the provisions of this chapter.

History

Mar. 2, 1962, 76 Stat. 16, Pub. L. 87-408, title III, § 317
July 25, 1989, D.C. Law 8-17, § 8(b), 36 DCR 4160

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 45-937.
1973 Ed., § 45-737.

Temporary Amendment of Section

For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 10(e) of the Tax Clarity and Recorder of Deeds Temporary Act of 2002 (D.C. Law 14-191, Oct. 5, 2002, law notification 49 DCR 9549).
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 10(e) of the Tax Clarity and Related Amendments Temporary Act of 2002 (D.C. Law 14-228, Mar. 25, 2003, law notification 50 DCR 2741).

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 10(e) of Tax Clarity and Recorder of Deeds Emergency Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-381, June 6, 2002, 49 DCR 5674).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 10(e) of Tax Clarity and Related Amendments Emergency Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-456, July 23, 2002, 49 DCR 8107).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 10(e) of Tax Clarity and Related Amendments Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-510, October 23, 2002, 49 DCR 10247).

Editor's Notes

Application of Law 8-17: See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 42-1103.